Utah statutes.
10-3-1009.   Certification of applicants for position -- Number -- Eligible lists, removal.

(1)  If a position in the classified civil service is to be filled, the civil service commission shall as soon as possible certify to the appointing power the names of:

(a)  10 persons, if the position to be filled is entry level; or

(b)  five persons, if the position to be filled is other than entry level.

(2)  Persons certified under Subsection (1) shall have the highest standing in the eligible list, but a lesser number may be certified if the required number is not on the eligible list.

(3)  If more than one position is available in the same department, the civil service commission shall also certify to the appointing power one additional name for each additional position to be filled.

(4) (a)  All persons not appointed shall be restored to their relative positions on the eligible list.

(b)  All persons who have been on the eligible list for two years without appointment shall be removed from the list and may be returned to it only upon regular examination.



Amended by Chapter 23, 1998 General Session

